Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1204.01
Abandoned water well, defined.

Abandoned water well means any water well (1) the use of which has been accomplished or permanently discontinued, (2) which has been decommissioned as described in the rules and regulations of the department, and (3) for which the notice of abandonment required by subsection (2) of section 46-602 has been filed with the department by the licensed water well contractor or licensed pump installation contractor who decommissioned the water well or by the water well owner if the owner decommissioned the water well.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 264;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 234;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 207;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1146;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 58;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 260.